Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,139
Forms; distribution.

The county clerk or election commissioner in each county shall distribute forms prepared by the commission to any person required to file any statement or report pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act other than forms or statements under sections 49-1480 to 49-1492.01. Such forms shall include, but not be limited to, filing forms and instructions, statements of financial interest, and campaign committee organization forms.

Laws 1983, LB 479, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 66.